Nevada, session 83, AB37.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 319.141 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.141 1. The Housing [Advocate] Liaison is hereby
created within the Division.
2. The Administrator shall appoint a person to serve in the
position of Housing [Advocate.] Liaison. The Housing [Advocate]
Liaison is in the unclassified service of the State and serves at the
pleasure of the Administrator.
3. The person so appointed pursuant to subsection 2 must be
knowledgeable about affordable housing and manufactured housing.
4. The Housing [Advocate] Liaison shall:
(a) Respond to written and telephonic inquiries received from
residents who reside in affordable housing and manufactured
housing and provide assistance to such residents in understanding
their rights and responsibilities;
(b) Conduct community outreach and provide information
concerning housing to residents who reside in affordable housing
and manufactured housing;
(c) Identify and investigate complaints of residents of affordable
housing and manufactured housing that relate to their housing and
provide assistance to such residents to resolve the complaints;
(d) Establish and maintain a system to collect and maintain
information pertaining to written and telephonic inquiries received
by the Division; and
(e) [Any] Perform any other duties specified by the
Administrator.
5. The Administrator may remove the Housing [Advocate]
Liaison from the office for any reason not prohibited by law.
Sec. 2. NRS 319.143 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.143 1. The Division shall create and maintain a statewide
low-income housing database.
2. The database must include, without limitation, the
compilation [and analysis] of demographic, economic and housing
data from a variety of sources, including, without limitation, reports
submitted pursuant to NRS 278.235 [, that:] and any survey
conducted by the Division, relating to the information that must be
included in the report required by subsection 3.
3. On or before December 31 of each year, the Division shall:
(a) [Provides for an annual assessment of] Analyze the data in
the database and prepare a report which must:
(1) Assess the affordable housing market at the city and
county level, including data relating to housing units, age of
housing, rental rates and rental vacancy rates, new home sales and
-
*AB37_R1*

– 5 –
resale of homes, new construction permits, mobile homes, lots
available for mobile homes and conversions of multifamily
condominiums;
[(b) Addresses]
(2) Address the housing needs of various population groups
in Nevada, such as households that rent, homeowners, elderly
households, veterans, persons with disabilities or special needs,
homeless persons, recovering persons with a substance use disorder,
persons suffering from mental health ailments and victims of
domestic violence, with each group distinguished to show the
percentage of the population group at different income levels, and a
determination of the number of households within each special-
needs group experiencing housing costs greater than [50] 30 percent
of their income, overcrowding or substandard housing;
[(c) Contains]
(3) Contain an estimate of the number and condition of
subsidized and other low-income housing units at the county level
and the identification of any subsidized units that are forecast to
convert to market-rate units within a [2-year] 3-year planning
period;
[(d) Provides]
(4) Provide a demographic and economic overview by local
and county jurisdiction, if feasible, for the population of Nevada,
including age, race and ethnicity, household size, migration, current
and forecast employment, household income and a summary
relating to the effects of demographics and economic factors on
housing demand;
[(e) Provides]
(5) Provide the number of housing units available to a victim
of domestic violence from any housing authority, as defined in NRS
315.021, and from participation in the program of housing
assistance pursuant to section 8 of the United States Housing Act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. § 1437f; and
[(f) Provides]
(6) Provide the number of terminations of victims of
domestic violence in this State from the program of housing
assistance pursuant to section 8 of the United States Housing Act of
1937, 42 U.S.C. § 1437f.
[3. The costs of creating and maintaining the database:
(a) Must be paid from the Account for Affordable Housing
created by NRS 319.500; and]
(b) [May not exceed $175,000 per year.] Post the report on the
Internet website of the Division.
4. If an owner of multifamily residential housing that is offered
for rent or lease in this State and is:
-
*AB37_R1*

– 6 –
(a) Accessible to persons with disabilities; and
(b) [Affordable] Attainable housing, as defined in
NRS 278.0105,
 has received any loan, grant or contribution for the multifamily
residential housing from the Federal Government or the State, the
owner shall, not less than quarterly, report to the Division for
inclusion in the database information concerning each unit of the
multifamily residential housing that is available and suitable for use
by a person with a disability.
5. The Division shall adopt regulations to carry out the
provisions of subsection 4.
Sec. 3. NRS 319.510 is hereby amended to read as follows:
319.510 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
money deposited in the Account for Affordable Housing must be
used:
(a) For the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation of
affordable housing for eligible families by public or private
nonprofit charitable organizations, housing authorities or local
governments through loans, grants or subsidies;
(b) To provide technical and financial assistance to public or
private nonprofit charitable organizations, housing authorities and
local governments for the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation
of affordable housing for eligible families;
(c) To provide funding for projects of public or private nonprofit
charitable organizations, housing authorities or local governments
that provide assistance to or guarantee the payment of rent or
deposits as security for rent for eligible families, including homeless
persons;
(d) To reimburse the Division for the costs of administering the
Account;
(e) To assist eligible persons by supplementing their monthly
rent for the manufactured home lots, as defined by NRS 118B.016,
on which their manufactured homes, as defined by NRS 118B.015,
are located; [and]
(f) To pay the costs of creating and maintaining the statewide
low-income housing database and preparing the annual report
required by NRS 319.143;
(g) To assist families that have children and whose income is
at or below the federally designated level signifying poverty; and
(h) In any other manner consistent with this section to assist
eligible families in obtaining or keeping affordable housing,
including use as the State’s contribution to facilitate the receipt of
related federal money.
2. [Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the] The
Division may expend each fiscal year not more than:
-
*AB37_R1*

– 7 –
(a) Six percent of the money [from] deposited in the Account as
reimbursement for the necessary costs of efficiently administering
the Account . [and any money received pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§
12701 et seq. In no case may the Division expend more than
$40,000 per year or an amount equal to 6 percent of any money
made available to the State pursuant to 42 U.S.C. §§ 12701 et seq.,
whichever is greater. In addition, the Division may expend not more
than $175,000 per year from]
(b) Six percent of the money deposited in the Account to create
and maintain the statewide low-income housing database and
prepare the annual report required by NRS 319.143. [The Division
may expend not more than $75,000 per year]
(c) Seventy-five thousand dollars of the money deposited in the
Account pursuant to NRS 375.070 for the purpose set forth in
paragraph (e) of subsection 1.
3. [Of the] The remaining money allocated from the Account
[:] after the expenditures made pursuant to subsections 1 and 2 [:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, 15 percent
must be distributed to the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services of the Department of Health and Human Services for use in
its program developed pursuant to 45 C.F.R. § 233.120, as that
section existed on December 4, 1997, to provide emergency
assistance to needy families with children, subject to the following:
(1) The Division of Welfare and Supportive Services shall
adopt regulations governing the use of the money that are consistent
with the provisions of this section.
(2) The money must be used solely for activities relating to
affordable housing that are consistent with the provisions of this
section.
(3) The money must be made available to families that have
children and whose income is at or below the federally designated
level signifying poverty.
(4) All money provided by the Federal Government to match
the money distributed to the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services pursuant to this section must be expended for activities
consistent with the provisions of this section.
(b) Eighty-five percent] must be distributed to public or private
nonprofit charitable organizations, housing authorities [and] or local
governments for the acquisition, construction and rehabilitation of
affordable housing for eligible families, subject to the following:
[(1)] (a) Priority may be given to those projects that provide
a preference for:
[(I)] (1) Women who are veterans;
[(II)] (2) Women who were previously incarcerated;
[(III)] (3) Survivors of domestic violence;
-
*AB37_R1*

– 8 –
[(IV)] (4) Elderly women who do not have stable or
adequate living arrangements; and
[(V)] (5) Unmarried persons with primary physical
custody of a child.
[(2)] (b) Priority must be given to those projects that qualify
for the federal tax credit relating to low-income housing.
[(3)] (c) Priority must be given to those projects that
anticipate receiving federal money to match the state money
distributed to them.
[(4)] (d) Priority must be given to those projects that have
the commitment of a local government to provide assistance to
them.
[(5)] (e) All money must be used to benefit families whose
income does not exceed 120 percent of the median income for
families residing in the same county, as defined by the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development.
[(6)] (f) Not less than 15 percent of the units acquired,
constructed or rehabilitated must be affordable to persons whose
income is at or below [the federally designated level signifying
poverty.] 30 percent of the median monthly gross household
income for the county in which the housing is located. For the
purposes of this subparagraph, a unit is affordable if a family does
not have to pay more than 30 percent of its gross income for housing
costs, including both utility and mortgage or rental costs.
[(7) To be eligible to receive money pursuant to this
paragraph, a project must be sponsored by a local government.
3. The Division may, pursuant to contract and in lieu of
distributing money to the Division of Welfare and Supportive
Services pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2, distribute any
amount of that money to private or public nonprofit entities for use
consistent with the provisions of this section.]
Sec. 3.5. Chapter 278 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 4 and 4.5 of this act.
Sec. 4. 1. “Tier one affordable housing” means housing
for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to not
more than 30 percent of the median monthly gross household
income for the county in which the housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 30
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For the purposes of this section, median gross household
income must be determined based upon the estimates of the United
-
*AB37_R1*

– 9 –
States Department of Housing and Urban Development of the
most current median gross family income for the county in which
the housing is located.
Sec. 4.5. 1. “Tier five affordable housing” means housing
for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to
more than 120 percent but not more than 150 percent of the
median monthly gross household income for the county in which
the housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 150
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For the purposes of this section, median gross household
income must be determined based upon the estimates of the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development of the
most current median gross family income for the county in which
the housing is located.
Sec. 5. NRS 278.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.010 As used in NRS 278.010 to 278.630, inclusive, unless
the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined in NRS
278.0103 to 278.0195, inclusive, and sections 4 and 4.5 of this act
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 6. NRS 278.0105 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.0105 [“Affordable] “Attainable housing” means tier one
affordable housing, tier two affordable housing [or] , tier three
affordable housing, tier four affordable housing or tier five
affordable housing.
Sec. 7. NRS 278.01902 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.01902 1. “Tier [one] two affordable housing” means
housing for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to more
than 30 percent but not more than 60 percent of the median
monthly gross household income for the county in which the
housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 60
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section, median gross household income
must be determined based upon the estimates of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development of the most current
-
*AB37_R1*

– 10 –
median gross family income for the county in which the housing is
located.
Sec. 8. NRS 278.01904 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.01904 1. “Tier [three] four affordable housing” means
housing for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to more
than 80 percent but not more than 120 percent of the median
monthly gross household income for the county in which the
housing is located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 120
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section, median gross household income
must be determined based upon the estimates of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development of the most current
median gross family income for the county in which the housing is
located.
Sec. 9. NRS 278.01906 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.01906 1. “Tier [two] three affordable housing” means
housing for a household:
(a) Which has a total monthly gross income that is equal to more
than 60 percent but not more than 80 percent of the median monthly
gross household income for the county in which the housing is
located; and
(b) Which costs not more than 30 percent of the total monthly
gross household income of a household whose income equals 80
percent of the median monthly gross household income for the
county in which the housing is located, including the cost of
utilities.
2. For purposes of this section, median gross household income
must be determined based upon the estimates of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development of the most current
median gross family income for the county in which the housing is
located.
Sec. 10. NRS 278.235 is hereby amended to read as follows:
278.235 1. If the governing body of a city or county is
required to include the housing element in its master plan pursuant
to NRS 278.150, the governing body, in carrying out the plan for
maintaining and developing [affordable] attainable housing to meet
the housing needs of the community, which is required to be
included in the housing element pursuant to subparagraph (8) of
paragraph (c) of subsection 1 of NRS 278.160, shall adopt at least
six of the following measures:
-
*AB37_R1*

– 11 –
(a) Reducing or subsidizing in whole or in part impact fees, fees
for the issuance of building permits collected pursuant to NRS
278.580 and fees imposed for the purpose for which an enterprise
fund was created.
(b) Selling land owned by the city or county, as applicable, to
developers exclusively for the development of [affordable]
attainable housing at not more than 10 percent of the appraised
value of the land, and requiring that any such savings, subsidy or
reduction in price be passed on to the purchaser of housing in such a
development. Nothing in this paragraph authorizes a city or county
to obtain land pursuant to the power of eminent domain for the
purposes set forth in this paragraph.
(c) Donating land owned by the city or county to a nonprofit
organization to be used for [affordable] attainable housing.
(d) Leasing land by the city or county to be used for [affordable]
attainable housing.
(e) Requesting to purchase land owned by the Federal
Government at a discounted price for the creation of [affordable]
attainable housing pursuant to the provisions of section 7(b) of the
Southern Nevada Public Land Management Act of 1998, Public
Law 105-263.
(f) Establishing a trust fund for [affordable] attainable housing
that must be used for the acquisition, construction or rehabilitation
of [affordable] attainable housing.
(g) Establishing a process that expedites the approval of plans
and specifications relating to maintaining and developing
[affordable] attainable housing.
(h) Providing money, support or density bonuses for
[affordable] attainable housing developments that are financed,
wholly or in part, with low-income housing tax credits, private
activity bonds or money from a governmental entity for [affordable]
attainable housing, including, without limitation, money received
pursuant to 12 U.S.C. § 1701q and 42 U.S.C. § 8013.
(i) Providing financial incentives or density bonuses to promote
appropriate transit-oriented or multi-story housing developments
that would include an [affordable] attainable housing component.
(j) Offering density bonuses or other incentives to encourage the
development of [affordable] attainable housing.
(k) Providing direct financial assistance to qualified applicants
for the purchase or rental of [affordable] attainable housing.
(l) Providing money for supportive services necessary to enable
persons with supportive housing needs to reside in [affordable]
attainable housing in accordance with a need for supportive housing
identified in the 5-year consolidated plan adopted by the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development for the city
-
*AB37_R1*

– 12 –
or county pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 12705 and described in 24 C.F.R.
Part 91.
2. A governing body may reduce or subsidize impact fees, fees
for the issuance of building permits or fees imposed for the purpose
for which an enterprise fund was created to assist in maintaining or
developing a project for [affordable] attainable housing, pursuant to
paragraph (a) of subsection 1, only if:
(a) When the incomes of all the residents of the project for
[affordable] attainable housing are averaged, the housing would be
affordable on average for a family with a total gross income that
does not exceed 60 percent of the median gross income for the
county concerned based upon the estimates of the United States
Department of Housing and Urban Development of the most current
median gross family income for the county.
(b) The governing body has adopted an ordinance that
establishes the criteria that a project for [affordable] attainable
housing must satisfy to receive assistance in maintaining or
developing the project for [affordable] attainable housing. Such
criteria must be designed to put into effect all relevant elements of
the master plan adopted by the governing body pursuant to
NRS 278.150.
(c) The project for [affordable] attainable housing satisfies the
criteria set forth in the ordinance adopted pursuant to paragraph (b).
(d) The governing body makes a determination that reducing or
subsidizing such fees will not impair adversely the ability of the
governing body to pay, when due, all interest and principal on any
outstanding bonds or any other obligations for which revenue from
such fees was pledged.
(e) The governing body holds a public hearing concerning the
effect of the reduction or subsidization of such fees on the economic
viability of the general fund of the city or county, as applicable, and,
if applicable, the economic viability of any affected enterprise fund.
3. On or before [July] March 15 of each year, the governing
body shall submit to the Housing Division of the Department of
Business and Industry a report, in the form prescribed by the
Housing Division, of how the measures adopted pursuant to
subsection 1 assisted the city or county in maintaining and
developing [affordable] attainable housing to meet the needs of the
community for the preceding year. The report must include an
analysis of the need for [affordable] attainable housing within the
city or county that exists at the end of the reporting period. The
governing body shall cooperate with the Housing Division to ensure
that the information contained in the report is appropriate for
inclusion in, and can be effectively incorporated into, the statewide
low-income housing database created pursuant to NRS 319.143.
-
*AB37_R1*

– 13 –
4. On or before [August] April 15 of each year, the Housing
Division shall compile the reports submitted pursuant to subsection
3 and post the compilation on the Internet website of the Housing
Division.
Sec. 11. NRS 375.070 is hereby amended to read as follows:
375.070 1. The county recorder shall transmit the proceeds of
the tax imposed by NRS 375.020 at the end of each quarter in the
following manner:
(a) An amount equal to that portion of the proceeds which is
equivalent to 10 cents for each $500 of value or fraction thereof
must be transmitted to the State Controller who shall deposit that
amount in the Account for Affordable Housing created pursuant to
NRS 319.500.
(b) In a county whose population is 700,000 or more, an amount
equal to that portion of the proceeds which is equivalent to 60 cents
for each $500 of value or fraction thereof must be transmitted to the
county treasurer for deposit in the county school district’s fund for
capital projects established pursuant to NRS 387.328, to be held and
expended in the same manner as other money deposited in that fund.
(c) The remaining proceeds must be transmitted to the State
Controller for deposit in the Local Government Tax Distribution
Account created by NRS 360.660 for credit to the respective
accounts of Carson City and each county.
2. In addition to any other authorized use of the proceeds it
receives pursuant to subsection 1, a county or city may use the
proceeds to pay expenses related to or incurred for the development
of tier one affordable housing , [and] tier two affordable housing [.]
and tier three affordable housing. A county or city that uses the
proceeds in that manner must give priority to the development of
tier one affordable housing , [and] tier two affordable housing and
tier three affordable housing for persons who are elderly or persons
with disabilities.
3. The expenses authorized by subsection 2 include, but are not
limited to:
(a) The costs to acquire land and developmental rights;
(b) Related predevelopment expenses;
(c) The costs to develop the land, including the payment of
related rebates;
(d) Contributions toward down payments made for the purchase
of affordable housing; and
(e) The creation of related trust funds.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Tier one affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it
in [NRS 278.01902.] section 4 of this act.
-
*AB37_R1*

– 14 –
(b) “Tier two affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed to it
in NRS [278.01906.] 278.01902.
(c) “Tier three affordable housing” has the meaning ascribed
to it in NRS 278.01906.
Sec. 12. The Legislative Counsel shall, in preparing
supplements to the Nevada Administrative Code, appropriately
change any references to an officer, agency or other entity whose
name is changed or whose responsibilities are transferred pursuant
to the provisions of this act to refer to the appropriate officer,
agency or other entity.
Sec. 13. 1. Any administrative regulations adopted by an
officer or an agency whose name has been changed or whose
responsibilities have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of
this act to another officer or agency remain in force until amended
by the officer or agency to which the responsibility for the adoption
of the regulations has been transferred.
2. Any contracts or other agreements entered into by an officer
or agency whose name has been changed or whose responsibilities
have been transferred pursuant to the provisions of this act to
another officer or agency are binding upon the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the administration of the provisions of
the contract or other agreement has been transferred. Such contracts
and other agreements may be enforced by the officer or agency to
which the responsibility for the enforcement of the provisions of the
contract or other agreement has been transferred.
3. Any action taken by an officer or agency whose name has
been changed or whose responsibilities have been transferred
pursuant to the provisions of this act to another officer or agency
remains in effect as if taken by the officer or agency to which the
responsibility for the enforcement of such actions has been
transferred.
Sec. 14. 1. This section and sections 1 to 9, inclusive, 11, 12
and 13 of this act become effective on July 1, 2025.
2. Section 10 of this act becomes effective on October 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB37_R1*